Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-738
Sections; exclusive; applicability of other law.

Sections 70-701 to 70-738 are complete in themselves, and shall be controlling. The provisions of any other law of this state, except as provided in said sections, shall not apply to a corporation organized under said sections.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 35, p. 213;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-835;

R.S.1943, § 70-738.